California, session 20252026, AB2132.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.74 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.74. This division does not apply to a groundwater recharge project if the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency determines that the project would address subsidence.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.